Mississippi statutes. Title 33. Military Affairs
Chapter 9. Property and Finances

§ 33-9-1.
Expenses paid from militia appropriation.

All expenditures necessary to carry the provisions of the chapter into effect are hereby authorized to be incurred and paid out of the military fund, except where otherwise specifically provided.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-92; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 62, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-9-3.
United States property and fiscal officer; bond.

The Governor shall appoint, designate or detail, on the recommendation of the Adjutant General, subject to the approval of the Secretary of the Army and the Secretary of the Air Force, a federally recognized field grade officer of the Mississippi National Guard who shall be designated as the United States property and fiscal officer for the state. Before entering upon the performance of his duties as property and fiscal officer he shall be required to give good and sufficient bond to the United States, as required by federal statutes, for the faithful performance of his duties and for the safekeeping and proper disposition of the federal funds and property entrusted to his care.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-93; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 63, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-9-5.
United States property and fiscal officer; general duties.

The United States property and fiscal officer for the state shall receipt and account for all funds and property belonging to the United States in possession of the National Guard and shall make returns and reports concerning such funds and property as may be required by the Secretary of the Army and the Secretary of the Air Force. He shall render, through the National Guard Bureau, such accounts of federal funds entrusted to him for disbursement as may be required by the Secretary of the Army and the Secretary of the Air Force. The secretary concerned may cause an inspection of the accounts and records of the property and fiscal officer to be made by an inspector general of his department at least once a year. The United States property and fiscal officer shall function under the direction of the Adjutant General.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-94; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 64, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-9-7.
Annual settlements for property both federal and state.

Federal Property. — The Adjutant General shall direct the USPFO to audit and effect annual settlements with responsible officers having federal property accounts. The USPFO shall cause the responsible officer to prepare and submit proper adjustment documents to cover any discrepancies discovered during such audit. When it is determined by duly appointed reviewing authority that losses were incurred due to fault or negligence of the responsible officer, he shall be held pecuniarily liable. When the responsible officer has been held pecuniarily liable, the Adjutant General shall make demand on the responsible officer for payment to the treasurer of the United States for the specified amount. The Adjutant General shall enter or cause to be entered a suit on the bond of such officer upon failure to comply with demand for payment.

State Property. — All property of a nonconsumable nature procured by the Adjutant General from state appropriated funds and like property purchased from unit maintenance funds shall be accounted for as state property. Property donated from any sources for National Guard use shall be considered state owned property. The Adjutant General shall maintain state property lists for all units and activities of the Mississippi National Guard. The Adjutant General shall cause state property accounts to be audited as he deems necessary. If the audit reflects shortages, the Adjutant General will cause an investigation to be made and take appropriate action. If such shortages are found to be due to the fault or negligence of the responsible officer, the Adjutant General shall make demand on the responsible officer for payment to the military fund of Mississippi for the specified amount. The Adjutant General shall enter or cause to be entered a suit on the bond of such officer upon failure to comply with demand for payment.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-95; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 65, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-9-9.
Prerequisites to sharing in appropriations.

No unit or activity shall participate in the annual appropriation for the maintenance of the militia unless the proper officer of such organizations shall have rendered the required training or was excused by proper authority.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-96; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 66; Laws, 1970, ch. 458, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1970.

§ 33-9-11.
Disbursements of military department funds.

The Adjutant General and the Comptroller of the Military Department are responsible for all obligations or indebtedness incurred in the name of the agency or by any employee for them when incurred by such employee acting within the scope of his or her employment. All bills, claims and demands against Military Department funds shall be certified or verified in the manner prescribed by regulations promulgated by the State Auditor and State Treasurer.

Purchase orders will be signed by the Adjutant General, comptroller or such other persons as the Adjutant General may designate in writing to the State Auditor. Requisitions for issuance of warrant will be signed by persons designated by the Adjutant General and will be approved by the Adjutant General, comptroller or such other persons as the Adjutant General may designate in writing to the State Auditor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-97; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 67; Laws, 1974, ch. 308, eff from and after passage (approved Feb. 27, 1974).

§ 33-9-13.
Allowances for maintenance.

Each unit shall be entitled to such maintenance fund allowances as may be provided in the annual appropriations act as apportioned by the Adjutant General under such regulations as the Governor may prescribe.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-98; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 68, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-9-15.
Transportation and subsistence of militia on active state duty.

There shall be provided by the state transportation for all officers and transportation and subsistence for all enlisted men who shall be lawfully ordered to active state duty. Necessary transportation, quartermaster’s stores and subsistence for troops when ordered on duty shall be contracted for by the proper officers and paid for as other military expenses.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-99; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 69, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-9-17.
Officers to surrender property.

Every officer of the Mississippi National Guard shall immediately upon his vacating an office, turn over to his successor, or to such other officer as may be designated by the commander in chief, or other competent authority, all records, retained copies of reports, public funds, and public military property pertaining to his former office or command. Any officer who shall fail or refuse to so turn over public funds or military property or records when called upon to do so, or shall abandon the same, or who shall fail or refuse to account for the same in the proper manner prescribed by law and regulations, shall be subject to trial by court-martial and punished as the court may direct.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-100; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 70, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-9-19.
Appropriation of public property.

Any officer or enlisted man taking any government property from any military installation without the consent of his unit commander shall be considered as appropriating government property for his own use and may be tried in any court of competent jurisdiction and on conviction thereof shall suffer a fine in any sum, not exceeding One Hundred Dollars ($100.00), together with the cost of such government property, or imprisonment in the county jail for a period not exceeding sixty (60) days, or shall suffer both fine and imprisonment.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-101; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 71, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-9-21.
Purchase or receiving of military property a misdemeanor.

If any person knowingly purchases or receives in pawn or pledge any military property of the state or of the United States he shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to imprisonment for a period not exceeding one (1) year, or fined not exceeding One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or to both such fine and imprisonment.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-102; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 72, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-9-23.
Disposition of state property.

All military property of the state which after proper inspection shall be found unsuitable for use of the state shall, notwithstanding any law to the contrary, be disposed of in such a manner as the Adjutant General shall direct and the proceeds thereof paid into the Military Fund of the state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-103; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 73, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-9-25.
Mississippi National Guard Special Construction Project Design Fund.

There is hereby created in the State Treasury a special fund to be known as the Mississippi National Guard Special Construction Project Design Fund for the purpose of receiving monies appropriated for the purpose of defraying the expense of construction design to enable the Mississippi Military Department to access federal construction funds. Unexpended amounts remaining in such special fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned on amounts in such special fund shall be deposited to the credit of the special fund.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1999, ch. 394, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1999.